Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1008
Detention facility; supply feminine hygiene product.

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) Detention facility means any:

(i) Facility operated by the Department of Correctional Services;

(ii) City or county jail;

(iii) Juvenile detention facility or staff secure juvenile facility as such terms are defined in section 83-4,125; or

(iv) Any other entity or institution operated by the state, a political subdivision, or a combination of political subdivisions for the careful keeping or rehabilitative needs of prisoners or detainees; and

(b) Prisoner means any adult or juvenile incarcerated or detained in any detention facility and includes, but is not limited to, any adult or juvenile who is accused of, convicted of, sentenced for, or adjudicated for violations of criminal law or the terms and conditions of parole, probation, pretrial release, post-release supervision, or a diversionary program.

(2) If any female prisoner in a detention facility needs a feminine hygiene product, the detention facility shall supply such product to the prisoner free of charge.

Laws 2022, LB984, § 11.